Indiana, session 2026, SB274.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 36-4-3-19.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 19.1. (a) This section applies only to a town that:
(1) was incorporated after 1990; and
(2) is located in a county having a population of more than
four hundred thousand (400,000) and less than seven hundred
thousand (700,000).
(b) The owner of real property meeting the following
requirements, may file a petition to disannex the property:
(1) The property consists of:
(A) at least thirty (30) acres; and
(B) not more than four (4) individual parcels;
that were included in the corporate limits of the town as the
town was originally incorporated.
(2) The boundary of a portion of the property is contiguous to
the boundary of:
(A) the unincorporated area of the county; or
2026 IN 274—LS 6937/DI 87


(B) another municipality.
(3) An available sanitary sewer owned by the municipality
does not abut the property.
(c) The petition to disannex must include the following:
(1) A legal description of the property that is the subject of the
petition.
(2) The signed and notarized signature of the property owner.
(d) The owner shall:
(1) record the executed petition to disannex with the county
recorder of the county in which the disannexed territory is
located; and
(2) file a copy of the executed petition with the county auditor
of the county in which the disannexed territory is located.
(e) The disannexation is complete and effective upon recording
and filing the petition as provided in subsection (d). The county
auditor shall list the disannexed property appropriately for
taxation.
(f) The county auditor shall forward a list of parcels disannexed
under this section to the following:
(1) The town that lost jurisdiction over the disannexed
territory.
(2) The county highway department of each county in which
the parcels affected are located.
(3) The county surveyor of each county in which the parcels
affected are located.
(4) Each plan commission, if any, that lost or gained
jurisdiction over the disannexed territory.
(5) The township trustee of each township that lost or gained
jurisdiction over the disannexed territory.
(6) The sheriff of each county in which parcels affected are
located.
(7) The office of the secretary of state.
(8) The office of census data established by IC 2-5-1.1-12.2.
(9) The department of local government finance, not later
than August 1 following the disannexation, in the manner
described by the department.
The county auditor may require the owner to furnish an adequate
number of copies of the list of disannexed parcels or may charge
the owner a fee for copies of the list.
(g) Sections 16, 17, 18, and 19 of this chapter do not apply to a
disannexation under this section.
(h) The owner of the disannexed property must execute a
2026 IN 274—LS 6937/DI 87


petition under section 5, 5.1, or 5.2 of this chapter for annexation
to a municipality not more than forty-eight (48) months after the
disannexation is complete and effective under subsection (e).
2026 IN 274—LS 6937/DI 87